Louisiana, session 2026, SB22.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:1732(14)(a)(xiv) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1732. Definitions
The following words and phrases, as used in this Chapter, unless a different
meaning is plainly required by the context, shall have the following meanings:
* * *
(14)(a) "Employer" or "participating employer" shall mean:
* * *
(xiv) Marshals or constables of city courts, if not otherwise eligible for
membership in any other local, state, or statewide retirement system.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature of the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 22 ENROLLED
signatures by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of
Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act
shall become effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.